Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-207.03
Accessibility barrier elimination, defined.

Accessibility barrier elimination shall include, but not be limited to, inspection for and removal of accessibility barriers, maintenance to reduce, lessen, put an end to, diminish, control, dispose of, or eliminate accessibility barriers, related restoration or replacement of facilities or property, any related architectural and engineering services, and any other action to reduce or eliminate accessibility barriers in the school buildings or on the school grounds under the control of the school board. Accessibility barrier elimination project costs shall include, but not be limited to, inspection, maintenance, accounting, emergency services, consultation, or any other action to reduce or eliminate accessibility barriers.

Laws 1992, LB 1001, § 8.